apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix.xml
    <pardef n="nov/i__adj">
      <!-- masculine -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>og</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oga</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ome</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omu</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>og</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oga</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ome</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omu</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- feminine -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oj</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oj</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- neuter -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>og</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oga</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ome</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omu</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ome</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omu</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>

    <e lm="novi"><par n="P__adj"/><i>nov</i><par n="nov/i__adj"/></e>
